Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2105.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. The portion of United States highway 77 from its junction
with interstate 70, then north on United States highway 77 in Geary county
to its western junction with United States highway 24 in Riley county, then
north on United States highway 77 from its eastern junction with United
States highway 24 to the junction with K-16 highway is hereby designated
as the POW MIA memorial highway. Upon compliance with K.S.A. 68-
10,114, and amendments thereto, the secretary of transportation shall place
suitable signs along the highway right-of-way at proper intervals to
indicate that the highway is the POW MIA memorial highway.
Sec. 2. Bridge No. 82-14-6.88 (026) located on K-82 highway in Clay
county is hereby designated as the POW MIA memorial bridge. Upon
compliance with K.S.A. 68-10,114, and amendments thereto, the secretary
of transportation shall place suitable signs to indicate that such bridge is
the POW MIA memorial bridge.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.